North Carolina, session 2025, HB1156.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-215.1(f3) reads as rewritten:
"(f3) The permittee for a wastewater system:
(1) May calculate its wastewater flows for new dwelling units discharging to
wastewater systems serving two or more dwelling units that have yet to be
connected and for which the permittee has allocated capacity, at 75 gallons
per day per bedroom, or at a lower rate approved by the Department.
Department in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection. If
wastewater flows are calculated pursuant to this subdivision, the minimum
volume of sewage from each dwelling unit is 75 gallons per day and each
additional bedroom above one bedroom increases the volume by 75 gallons
per day.
(2) Shall calculate its wastewater flows for new dwelling units discharging to
wastewater systems serving two or more dwelling units that have yet to be
connected and for which the permittee has not allocated capacity at 75 gallons
per day per bedroom, or at a lower rate approved by the Department.
Department in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection. For
wastewater flows calculated pursuant to this subdivision, the minimum
volume of sewage from each dwelling unit is 75 gallons per day and each
additional bedroom above one bedroom increases the volume by 75 gallons
per day.
(3) May calculate its wastewater flows for new dwelling units discharging to
wastewater systems serving two or more dwelling units that have yet to be
connected at a flow rate less than 75 gallons per day per bedroom if approved
by the Department based on the permittee demonstrating that the calculated
flow rate corresponds to the average actual flow experienced during the last
calendar year and that using this flow rate will not result in any adverse impact
on public health or the environment. The Department shall not approve any
flow rates for new dwelling units calculated at less than 55 gallons per day per
bedroom."
*H1156-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used by the Department for the purpose of reviewing wastewater
design flow rates proposed by permitted wastewater treatment systems in accordance with
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1156-First Edition